apertium-kmr.kmr.dix
    <pardef n="wel/at__n">
      <e><p><l>at</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>êt</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atê</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ato</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atek</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atekî</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atekî</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>at</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atan</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atên</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atên</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atin</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atinan</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atine</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atî</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atan</l><r>at<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="baj/ar__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>êr</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arê</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aro</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arek</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arekî</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arekî</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aran</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arên</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arên</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arin</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arinan</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arine</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arî</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aran</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

      <pardef n="mirov__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ekî</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ekî</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ên</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ên</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inan</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

      <pardef n="aw/a__n_m">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayê</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ak</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>akî</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>akî</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayek</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayekî</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayekî</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayan</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayên</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayên</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayin</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayinan</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayine</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayî</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayan</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bavik"><i>bavik</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fîl"><i>fîl</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="çîrokbêj"><i>çîrokbêj</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sîxur"><i>sîxur</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pronav"><i>pronav</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mişext"><i>mişext</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="xwê"><i>xwê</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pênûs"><i>pênûs</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pers"><i>pers</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dîroknas"><i>dîroknas</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="serokkomar"><i>serokkomar</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="doktor"><i>doktor</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fermandar"><i>fermandar</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bajarok"><i>bajarok</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="demokrat"><i>demokrat</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ciwan"><i>ciwan</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fizîk"><i>fizîk</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bakûr"><i>bakûr</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="şehîd"><i>şehîd</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="welat"><i>wel</i><par n="wel/at__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ac"><i>ac</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="alodar"><i>alodar</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="argo"><i>argo</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="ateş"><i>ateş</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="açar"><i>açar</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="bang"><i>bang</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="bawil"><i>bawil</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="beq"><i>beq</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="best"><i>best</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="birêvebir"><i>birêvebir</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="cacik"><i>cacik</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="cenab"><i>cenab</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="cild"><i>cild</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="dans"><i>dans</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="dem"><i>dem</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="destar"><i>destar</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="dewar"><i>dewar</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="dirav"><i>dirav</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="dêw"><i>dêw</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="eks"><i>eks</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="ewr"><i>ewr</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="firaq"><i>firaq</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="gaz"><i>gaz</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="girş"><i>girş</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="gumlek"><i>gumlek</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="hal"><i>hal</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="heq"><i>heq</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="hevkûf"><i>hevkûf</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="hogiç"><i>hogiç</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="hîm"><i>hîm</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="isim"><i>isim</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="kalo"><i>kalo</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="kefçik"><i>kefçik</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="ker"><i>ker</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="kifş"><i>kifş</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="koh"><i>koh</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="kulind"><i>kulind</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="kurrheval"><i>kurrheval</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="kêl"><i>kêl</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="laq"><i>laq</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="lewer"><i>lewer</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="lîs"><i>lîs</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="manto"><i>manto</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="melik"><i>melik</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="mewzû"><i>mewzû</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="mircan"><i>mircan</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="mudet"><i>mudet</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="mûçinkê nînokan"><i>mûçinkê nînokan</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="nemêr"><i>nemêr</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="nêregur"><i>nêregur</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="palerîn"><i>palerîn</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="pedal"><i>pedal</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="petat"><i>petat</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="pizan"><i>pizan</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="prostat"><i>prostat</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="qawin"><i>qawin</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="qirax"><i>qirax</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="ref"><i>ref</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="rêbwar"><i>rêbwar</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="sergîn"><i>sergîn</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="sosîs"><i>sosîs</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="tan"><i>tan</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="tevrik"><i>tevrik</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="tûlik"><i>tûlik</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="wext"><i>wext</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="xwedan"><i>xwedan</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="zibil"><i>zibil</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="Çeko"><i>Çeko</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="çik û pik"><i>çik û pik</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="îlac"><i>îlac</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="şehsiwar"><i>şehsiwar</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
      <e lm="çav"><i>çav</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bajar"><i>baj</i><par n="baj/ar__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="devê"><i>devê</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pismam"><i>pismam</i><par n="mirov__n_m"/></e>
